Hawaii statutes.
PART V.
POULTRY PROCESSORS AND RELATED

INDUSTRIES

§161-36 Records; subject to examination.
(a) For the enforcement of this chapter, the following classes of persons
shall keep records, as the board by rule may require, that will fully and
correctly disclose all transactions; and all persons subject to these
requirements shall, at all reasonable times, upon notice by an authorized
representative of the board, afford that representative or any authorized
representative of the United States Secretary of Agriculture access to their
places of business and opportunity to examine the facilities, inventory, and
records thereof, to copy all those records, and to take reasonable samples of
their inventory upon payment of the fair market value therefor:

(1) Any person that is engaged, in or for intrastate
commerce, in the business of slaughtering any poultry or processing, freezing,
packaging, or labeling any carcasses, or parts or products of carcasses, of any
poultry capable of use as human or animal food, including any person operating
under the exemptions in section 161-29(a)(2) or (3);

(2) Any person that is engaged in the business of
buying or selling, as poultry brokers, wholesalers, or otherwise, or
transporting in intrastate commerce, or storing in or for intrastate commerce,
any carcasses, or parts or products of carcasses, of any poultry;

(3) Any person that is engaged in business, in or for
intrastate commerce, as renderers, or engaged in the business of buying,
selling, or transporting, in intrastate commerce, any dead, dying, disabled, or
diseased poultry, or parts of the carcasses of any such poultry that died
otherwise than by slaughter.

(b) Any record required to be maintained by
this section shall be maintained for the period specified by rule. [L 1969, c
212, §23; am L 1993, c 92, §7]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next